Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The School Psychologist Interstate Licensure Compact is  enacted into law
and entered into on behalf of this state  with all other jurisdictions legally joining therein in
the form substantially as follows:
SCHOOL PSYCHOLOGIST INTERSTATE LICENSURE COMPACT
SECTION 1. PURPOSE
The purpose of this Compact  is to facilitate the interstate practice of school psychology
in educational or school settings, and in so doing to improve the availability  of school psy-
chological services to the public. This Compact is intended to establish a pathway  to allow
school psychologists to  obtain equivalent licenses to provide school psychological services in
any member state. In this way, this Compact shall enable the member states  to ensure that
safe and effective school  psychological services are available and delivered by appropriately
qualified professionals in their educational settings.
To facilitate the objectives described above, this Compact:
A. Enables school psychologists who qualify for receipt of an equivalent  license to prac-
tice in other member states without first satisfying burdensome and  duplicative require-
ments;
B. Promotes the mobility of school psychologists between and among the member  states
in order to address workforce shortages and  to ensure that safe and reliable school psycho-
logical services are available in each member state;
C. Enhances the public accessibility of school psychological services by increasing the
availability of qualified, licensed school psychologists through the establishment  of an effi-
cient and streamlined pathway for licensees to practice in other member states;
D. Preserves and respects the authority of each member state to protect the health and
safety of its residents by ensuring that  only qualified, licensed professionals are authorized
to provide school psychological services within that state;
E. Requires school  psychologists practicing within a member state to comply with the
scope of practice laws present in the state  where the school psychological services are being
provided;
Enrolled House Bill 2596 (HB 2596-INTRO) Page 1
F. Promotes cooperation between the member states in regulating  the practice of school
psychology within those states; and
G. Facilitates the  relocation of military members and their spouses who are licensed to
provide school psychological services.
SECTION 2. DEFINITIONS
A. “Active  military member” means any person with full-time duty status in the armed
forces of the United States, including  members of the National Guard or in a reserve com-
ponent of the Armed Forces of the United States.
B. “Adverse action”  means disciplinary action or encumbrance imposed on a license by
a state licensing authority.
C. “Alternative program” means a nondisciplinary, prosecutorial diversion,  monitoring,
or practice remediation process entered into in lieu of an adverse action  that is applicable
to a school psychologist and approved by the state  licensing authority of a member state in
which the participating school psychologist is licensed. This includes, but is not limited to,
programs to which licensees with substance abuse or addiction  issues may be referred in lieu
of an adverse action.
D. “Commissioner” means  the individual appointed by a member state to serve as the
representative to the School Psychologist  Interstate Licensure Compact Commission for that
member state.
E. “Compact” means this School Psychologist Interstate Licensure Compact.
F. “Continuing professional education” means a requirement, imposed  by a member state
as a condition of license renewal, to provide evidence  of successful participation in profes-
sional educational activities relevant to the provision of school psychological services.
G. “Criminal background check” means the submission of  fingerprints or other biometric
information for  a license applicant for the purpose of obtaining that applicant’s criminal
history record information, as  defined in 28 C.F.R. 20.3(d) and in effect on January 1, 2026,
and the state’s criminal history record repository  as defined in 28 C.F.R. 20.3(f) and in effect
on January 1, 2026.
H. “Doctoral-level  degree” means a graduate degree program that consists of at least 90
graduate semester hours or equivalent in the field of school psychology and includes  a
supervised internship.
I. “Encumbered license” means a license that a  state licensing authority has limited in
any way other than through an alternative program, including temporary or provisional li-
censes.
J. “Equivalent license” means a license to practice school psychology that  a member
state has identified as a license that may be provided to school psychologists  from other
member states pursuant to this Compact.
K. “Executive committee” means the  chair, vice chair, secretary and treasurer of the
School Psychologist Interstate Licensure Compact Commission and any  other commissioners
as may be determined by commission rule or bylaw.
L. “Home state” means the member state that issued the  home state license to the
licensee and that is the licensee’s primary state of practice.
M. “Home state  license” means the license that is not an encumbered license issued by
the home state to provide school psychological services.
N. “License” means  a current license, certification, or other authorization granted by a
member state’s state  licensing authority that permits an individual to provide school psy-
chological services.
O. “Licensee” means an individual who  holds a license from a member state to provide
school psychological services.
P. “Member  state” means a state that has enacted this Compact and been admitted to
the School Psychologist Interstate Licensure Compact Commission in accordance with the
provisions herein and commission rules.
Enrolled House Bill 2596 (HB 2596-INTRO) Page 2
Q. “Model compact” means the model language for the  School Psychologist Interstate
Licensure Compact on file with the Council of State  Governments or other entity as desig-
nated by the School Psychologist Interstate Licensure Compact Commission.
R. “Practice of school psychology” means the delivery of school psychological services.
S. “Qualifying national  exam” means a national licensing examination endorsed by the
National Association of School Psychologists and any other exam as approved by  the rules
of the School Psychologist Interstate Licensure Compact Commission.
T. “Qualifying school psychologist  education program” means an education program that
awards a specialist-level or doctoral-level  degree or equivalent upon completion and is ap-
proved by the  rules of the School Psychologist Interstate Licensure Compact Commission
as meeting the necessary minimum educational standards to ensure that its graduates  are
ready, qualified, and able to engage in the practice of school psychology.
U. “Remote state” means a member state other than  the home state where a licensee
holds a license through this Compact.
V. “Rule” means a regulation  promulgated by an entity, including but not limited to the
School Psychologist Interstate Licensure Compact Commission and the  state licensing au-
thority of each member state, that has the force of law.
W. “School psychological services” means academic, mental and behavioral health  ser-
vices including assessment, prevention, consultation  and collaboration, intervention, and
evaluation provided by a school psychologist in a school, as outlined in applicable professional
standards as determined by rule of the  School Psychologist Interstate Licensure Compact
Commission.
X. “School psychologist” means an individual who has  met the requirements to obtain a
home state license that legally conveys the professional title  of school psychologist or its
equivalent, as determined by the rules of the School  Psychologist Interstate Licensure
Compact Commission.
Y. “School Psychologist Interstate Licensure Compact  Commission” means the joint
government agency established by this Compact whose membership consists  of represen-
tatives from each member state that  has enacted this Compact, and as further described in
section 7 of this Compact.
Z. “Scope  of practice” means the procedures, actions, and processes a school psychologist
licensed in a state is permitted to undertake in that state and the  circumstances under
which that licensee is permitted to undertake those procedures,  actions, and processes. Such
procedures, actions, and processes, and the circumstances under which they  may be under-
taken, may be established through means including, but not  limited to, statute, regulations,
case law, and other processes available to the state  licensing authority or other government
agency.
AA. “Specialist-level degree”  means a degree program that requires at least 60 graduate
semester hours or equivalent in the field of school psychology and includes a supervised
internship.
BB. “State”  means any state, commonwealth, district, or territory of the United States
of America.
CC. “State licensing authority”  means a member state’s regulatory body responsible for
issuing licenses or otherwise overseeing the practice of school psychology.
DD. “State specific requirement” means a requirement  for licensure covered in
coursework or examination that includes content of unique interest to the state.
SECTION 3.
STATE PARTICIPATION IN THIS COMPACT
A. To be eligible to join this Compact, and to maintain eligibility as a member  state, a
state must:
1. Enact a compact statute  that is not materially different from the model compact, as
defined in the rules of the School Psychologist Interstate Licensure Compact Commission;
Enrolled House Bill 2596 (HB 2596-INTRO) Page 3
2. Participate in the sharing  of information with other member states as reasonably
necessary to accomplish the objectives  of this Compact, and as further defined in section 8
of this Compact;
3. Identify and maintain with the commission a list of  equivalent licenses available to
licensees who hold a home state license under this Compact;
4. Have a mechanism in place for receiving and  investigating complaints about licensees;
5. Notify  the commission, in compliance with the terms of this Compact and the
commission’s rules, of any adverse action taken against a  licensee, or of the availability of
investigative information that relates to a licensee or applicant for licensure;
6. Require that applicants for a home state license have:
a. Taken and passed a qualifying national exam, as defined  by the rules of the commis-
sion;
b. Completed a minimum of 1,200 hours of supervised internship, of which  at least 600
hours must have been completed in a school, prior to being approved for licensure; and
c. Graduated from a qualifying school psychologist education program; and
7. Comply with the terms of this Compact and the rules of the commission.
B. Each member state shall grant an equivalent license to  practice school psychology in
that state upon application by a licensee who satisfies the criteria  of section 4.A of this
Compact. Each member state shall grant renewal of the  equivalent license to a licensee who
satisfies the criteria of section 4.B of this Compact.
C. Member states may set and collect a fee for granting an equivalent license.
SECTION 4.
SCHOOL PSYCHOLOGIST PARTICIPATION IN THIS COMPACT
A. To obtain and maintain an equivalent  license from a remote state under this Compact,
a licensee must:
1. Hold and maintain an active home state license;
2. Satisfy any applicable state specific requirements established by the member  state af-
ter an equivalent license is granted;
3. Complete any administrative or application requirements that the School  Psychologist
Interstate Licensure Compact Commission may establish by rule, and  pay any associated
fees;
4. Complete any requirements for renewal in the home state, including applicable con-
tinuing professional education requirements; and
5. Upon application to receive a  license under this Compact, undergo a criminal back-
ground check in the member state in which the equivalent license is sought in accordance
with the laws and regulations of the member state.
B. To renew an  equivalent license in a member state other than the home state, a
licensee must only apply for renewal, complete a background check, and pay  renewal fees
as determined by the member state’s state licensing authority.
SECTION 5.
ACTIVE MILITARY MEMBERS OR THEIR SPOUSES
A licensee who is an active military  member or is the spouse of an active military
member shall be deemed to hold a home state license in any of the following locations:
A. The licensee’s permanent residence.
B. A member state that is the licensee’s primary state of practice.
C. A member state where the licensee has relocated pursuant to a permanent  change of
station.
SECTION 6.
DISCIPLINE/ADVERSE ACTIONS
A. Nothing in this Compact shall be deemed or  construed to limit the authority of a
member state to investigate or impose disciplinary measures on licensees according to  the
laws of the state.
B. Member  states shall be authorized to receive, and shall provide, files and information
regarding the investigation and discipline, if  any, of licensees in other member states upon
request. Any member  state receiving such information or files shall protect and maintain the
Enrolled House Bill 2596 (HB 2596-INTRO) Page 4
security and confidentiality thereof in at least  the same manner that it maintains its own
investigatory or disciplinary files and information. Prior to  disclosing any disciplinary or
investigatory information received from  another member state, the disclosing state shall
communicate its intention and purpose for such disclosure to the  member state that ori-
ginally provided that information.
SECTION 7. ESTABLISHMENT OF THE  SCHOOL PSYCHOLOGIST INTERSTATE
LICENSURE COMPACT COMMISSION
A. The member states hereby  create and establish a joint government agency whose
membership consists of all member  states that have enacted this Compact, and this agency
shall be known as  the School Psychologist Interstate Licensure Compact Commission. The
commission is an instrumentality of the member states acting jointly and not an
instrumentality of any one state. The commission shall come into existence on or  after the
effective date of this Compact as set forth in section 11 of this Compact.
B. Membership, Voting, and Meetings
1. Each member state shall have and be limited  to one delegate selected by that member
state’s state licensing authority.
2. The delegate shall be the primary administrative officer of the member state’s state
licensing authority or their designee who is an employee of the member state’s state licens-
ing authority.
3. The commission shall by rule or bylaw establish a term of office for delegates  and may
by rule or bylaw establish term limits.
4. The commission may recommend removal or suspension of any delegate from office.
5. A member  state’s state licensing authority shall fill any vacancy of its delegate oc-
curring on the commission within 60 days of the vacancy.
6. Each delegate shall  be entitled to one vote on all matters before the commission re-
quiring a vote by commission delegates.
7. A delegate shall vote in person or by  such other means as provided in the bylaws. The
bylaws may provide for delegates to meet by telecommunication, videoconference, or other
means of communication.
8. The commission shall meet at least  once during each calendar year. Additional
meetings may be held as set forth in the bylaws. The  commission may meet by telecommu-
nication, videoconference or other similar electronic means.
C. The commission shall have the following powers:
1. Establish the fiscal year of the commission;
2. Establish code of conduct and conflict of interest policies;
3. Establish and amend rules and bylaws;
4. Establish the procedure through which a licensee may change their home state;
5. Maintain its financial records in accordance with the bylaws;
6. Meet and take such actions as are consistent with  the provisions of this Compact, the
commission’s rules, and the bylaws;
7. Initiate and conclude legal proceedings or actions in the name of  the commission,
provided that the standing of any member  state’s state licensing authority to sue or be sued
under applicable law shall not be affected;
8. Maintain and certify records and information provided to a member state  as the
authenticated business records of the commission, and designate an agent  to do so on the
commission’s behalf;
9. Purchase and maintain insurance and bonds;
10. Borrow, accept, or  contract for services of personnel, including, but not limited to,
employees of a member state;
11. Conduct an annual financial review, hire employees, elect or appoint officers,  fix
compensation, define duties,  grant such individuals appropriate authority to carry out the
purposes of this Compact, and  establish the commission’s personnel policies and programs
Enrolled House Bill 2596 (HB 2596-INTRO) Page 5
relating to conflicts of interest, qualifications of personnel, and other related personnel
matters;
12. Assess and collect fees;
13. Accept any and all appropriate gifts, donations, grants  of money, other sources of
revenue, equipment, supplies, materials, and  services, and receive, utilize, and dispose of the
same, provided that at  all times the commission shall avoid any appearance of impropriety
or conflict of interest;
14. Lease, purchase, retain,  own, hold, improve, or use any property, real, personal, or
mixed, or any undivided interest therein;
15. Sell, convey, mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange, abandon, or otherwise dispose of any
property real, personal, or mixed;
16. Establish a budget and make expenditures;
17. Borrow money;
18. Appoint committees, including standing  committees, composed of members, state
regulators, state legislators or their representatives, and consumer representatives,  and
such other interested persons as may be designated in this Compact and the bylaws;
19. Provide and receive information  from, and cooperate with, law enforcement agencies;
20. Establish and elect an executive committee, including a chair,  a vice chair, a secre-
tary, a treasurer and any other commissioners as may be determined by commission rule
or bylaw;
21. Determine whether a state’s adopted language is materially different from the model
compact language such  that the state would not qualify for participation in this Compact;
and
22. Perform such  other functions as may be necessary or appropriate to achieve the
purposes of this Compact.
D. The Executive Committee
1. The executive committee shall have the power to act on  behalf of the commission ac-
cording to  the terms of this Compact. The powers, duties, and responsibilities of the exec-
utive committee shall include:
a. Oversee the day-to-day activities of the administration  of this Compact, including
enforcement and compliance with the provisions  of this Compact, its rules and bylaws, and
other such duties as deemed necessary;
b. Recommend to the commission changes to the rules or bylaws, changes to this Com-
pact legislation, fees charged to member states, fees charged to licensees, and other fees;
c. Ensure  administration services for this Compact are appropriately provided, including
by contract;
d. Prepare and recommend the budget;
e. Maintain financial records on behalf of the commission;
f. Monitor compliance of this Compact  by member states and provide compliance reports
to the commission;
g. Establish additional committees as necessary;
h. Exercise the powers and duties of the  commission during the interim between com-
mission meetings, except for adopting or amending  rules, adopting or amending bylaws, and
exercising any other powers and duties expressly reserved to  the commission by rule or by-
law; and
i. Other duties as provided in the rules or bylaws of the commission.
2. The executive committee shall be composed of up to seven members:
a. The chair and vice chair of the commission shall be voting  members of the executive
committee; and
b. The commission shall  elect five voting members from the current membership of the
commission.
Enrolled House Bill 2596 (HB 2596-INTRO) Page 6
3. The commission may remove any member of the  executive committee as provided in
the commission’s bylaws.
4. The executive committee shall meet at least annually.
a. Executive committee meetings shall be open to the public, except that  the executive
committee may meet  in a closed, nonpublic meeting as provided in subsection F.2 of this
section.
b. The executive committee shall give  30 days’ notice of its meetings, posted on its
website and as determined to provide notice to persons with an interest in the business of
the commission.
c. The executive committee  may hold a special meeting in accordance with subsection
F.1.b. of this section.
E. The commission shall adopt and provide to the member states an annual report.
F. Meetings of the commission
1. All meetings shall be open to the public, except that the commission may  meet in a
closed, nonpublic meeting as provided in subsection F.2 of this section.
a. Public notice for  all meetings of the full commission shall be given in the same manner
as required under the rulemaking provisions in section 9 of  this Compact, except that the
commission may hold a special meeting as provided in subsection F.1.b of this section.
b. The commission may hold a special  meeting when the commission must meet to con-
duct emergency business by giving 48 hours’ notice to all commissioners,  on the
commission’s website, and other means as  provided in the commission’s rules. The
commission’s legal counsel shall certify  that the commission’s need to meet qualifies as an
emergency.
2. The commission or the executive committee or other committees of the  commission
may convene in a closed, nonpublic meeting for the  commission or executive committee or
other committees of the commission to receive legal advice or to discuss:
a. Noncompliance of a member state with its obligations under this Compact;
b. The employment, compensation, discipline or other  matters, practices, or procedures
related to specific employees;
c. Current or threatened discipline  of a licensee by the commission or by a member
state’s state licensing authority;
d. Current, threatened, or reasonably anticipated litigation;
e. Negotiation of contracts for the purchase, lease, or sale of goods, services, or real
estate;
f. Accusing any person of a crime or formally censuring any person;
g. Trade secrets or commercial or financial information that is privileged or  confidential;
h. Information of a personal nature where  disclosure would constitute a clearly unwar-
ranted invasion of personal privacy;
i. Investigative records compiled for law enforcement purposes;
j. Information related to any investigative reports prepared by or on behalf of  or for use
of the commission or other committee charged  with responsibility of investigation or deter-
mination of compliance issues pursuant to this Compact;
k. Matters specifically exempted from disclosure by federal or member state law; or
l. Other matters as promulgated by the commission by rule.
3. If a meeting, or portion of a meeting, is closed,  the presiding officer shall state that
the meeting will be closed and reference each relevant  exempting provision, and such refer-
ence shall be recorded in the minutes.
4. The commission shall keep minutes that fully and clearly  describe all matters dis-
cussed in a meeting and  shall provide a full and accurate summary of actions taken, and the
reasons therefore, including a description of the views expressed. All documents considered
in connection with an action shall be identified in such minutes. All minutes and  documents
Enrolled House Bill 2596 (HB 2596-INTRO) Page 7
of a closed meeting shall remain under seal, subject to release only by a majority vote of the
commission or order of a court of competent jurisdiction.
G. Financing of the commission
1. The commission shall pay, or provide  for the payment of, the reasonable expenses of
its establishment, organization, and ongoing activities.
2. The commission may accept any and all appropriate revenue sources as provided  in
subsection C.13 of this section.
3. The commission  may levy on and collect an annual assessment from each member
state and impose fees on licensees practicing in the member states under an equivalent li-
cense to cover the cost of the operations and activities of the commission and its staff, which
must be in a  total amount sufficient to cover its annual budget as approved each year for
which revenue is not provided by other sources. The aggregate annual assessment  amount
for member states shall be allocated based upon  a formula that the commission shall
promulgate by rule.
4. The commission shall  not incur obligations of any kind prior to securing the funds
adequate to meet the obligations nor shall the commission pledge the credit  of any of the
member states, except by and with the authority of the member state.
5. The commission shall keep accurate accounts of all receipts and disbursements. The
receipts and disbursements of the commission shall be subject to the financial  review and
accounting procedures established under its bylaws. However, all receipts and disbursements
of funds handled by the commission  shall be subject to an annual financial review by a cer-
tified or licensed public accountant, and the report of the financial review shall be included
in and become part of the annual report of the commission.
H. Qualified Immunity, Defense, and Indemnification
1. The members, officers, executive director,  employees and representatives of the com-
mission shall be immune from suit and liability, both  personally and in their official capacity,
for any  claim for damage to or loss of property or personal injury or other civil liability
caused by or arising out of any actual or alleged act, error,  or omission that occurred, or
that the person against whom the claim is made had a reasonable basis for believing  oc-
curred, within the scope of commission employment, duties,  or responsibilities, provided that
nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to protect any such person  from suit or liability
for any damage, loss, injury, or liability caused by the intentional or willful or wanton mis-
conduct of that person. The procurement of insurance of any type by the commission shall
not in any way compromise or limit the immunity granted hereunder.
2. The commission shall defend  any member, officer, executive director, employee, and
representative of the commission in any  civil action seeking to impose liability arising out
of any actual or alleged act, error, or omission that  occurred within the scope of commission
employment, duties, or responsibilities, or as determined by the commission  that the person
against whom the claim is  made had a reasonable basis for believing occurred within the
scope of commission employment, duties, or responsibilities,  provided that nothing in this
paragraph shall be construed  to prohibit that person from retaining their own counsel at
their own expense and provided further that  the actual or alleged act, error, or omission did
not result from that person’s intentional or willful or wanton misconduct.
3. The commission shall indemnify and  hold harmless any member, officer, executive di-
rector, employee, and representative of the commission for the amount of  any settlement
or judgment obtained against that person arising out of any actual or alleged act, error,  or
omission that occurred  within the scope of commission employment, duties, or responsibil-
ities, or that such person had  a reasonable basis for believing occurred within the scope of
commission employment, duties, or responsibilities, provided that  the actual or alleged act,
error, or omission did not  result from the intentional or willful or wanton misconduct of that
person.
Enrolled House Bill 2596 (HB 2596-INTRO) Page 8
4. Nothing herein shall be construed as a limitation on  the liability of any licensee for
professional malpractice or misconduct, which shall be  governed solely by any other appli-
cable state laws.
5. Nothing in this Compact shall be interpreted to waive or otherwise  abrogate a member
state’s state action immunity or state action  affirmative defense with respect to antitrust
claims under the Sherman Act, the  Clayton Act, or any other state or federal antitrust or
anticompetitive law or regulation.
6. Nothing in this Compact shall be construed to be  a waiver of sovereign immunity by
the member states or by the commission.
SECTION 8. FACILITATING INFORMATION EXCHANGE
A. The School  Psychologist Interstate Licensure Compact Commission shall provide for
facilitating the exchange of information  to administer and implement the provisions of this
Compact in accordance  with the rules of the commission and consistent with generally ac-
cepted data protection principles.
B. Notwithstanding any  other provision of state law to the contrary, a member state
shall agree to  provide for the facilitation of the following licensee information as required
by the rules of the commission, including:
1. Identifying information;
2. Licensure data;
3. Adverse actions against a license and information related thereto;
4. Nonconfidential information related to alternative program participation, the beginning
and ending dates of such participation, and other information related to such participation
not made confidential under member state law;
5. Any denial of application for licensure, and the reasons for such denial;
6. The presence of investigative information; and
7. Other information that may facilitate the administration of this Compact or  the pro-
tection of the public, as determined by the rules of the commission.
C. Nothing in this Compact shall be  deemed or construed to alter, limit, or inhibit the
power of a member state to control and maintain ownership  of its licensee information or
alter, limit, or inhibit the laws or regulations governing licensee information in the member
state.
SECTION 9.
RULEMAKING
A. The  School Psychologist Interstate Licensure Compact Commission shall exercise its
rulemaking powers pursuant to the criteria set forth in this Compact  and the rules adopted
thereunder. Rules and amendments shall become binding as of the date  specified in each rule
or amendment. Such rules shall be binding on the State of Oregon only to the  extent they
are adopted as rules by the state’s state licensing authority.
B. The commission shall promulgate reasonable rules to achieve the intent and purpose
of this Compact. In the event the commission exercises its rulemaking authority in a manner
that is beyond purpose and intent of this Compact, or the powers granted hereunder,  then
such an action by the commission shall be invalid and have no force and effect  of law in the
member states.
C. If a majority of the legislatures of the member states rejects a rule,  by enactment of
a statute or resolution in the same manner used to adopt this  Compact within four years
of the  date of adoption of the rule, then such rule shall have no further force and effect in
any member state.
D. Rules or amendments to the rules shall be adopted  or ratified at a regular or special
meeting of the commission in accordance with commission rules and bylaws.
E. Prior to promulgation and adoption of a final rule or rules by the commission, and  at
least 30 days in advance of the meeting at which the rule will be  considered and voted upon,
the commission shall file a notice of proposed rulemaking:
1. On the website of the commission or other publicly accessible platform; and
Enrolled House Bill 2596 (HB 2596-INTRO) Page 9
2. On the website  of each member state’s state licensing authority or other publicly ac-
cessible platform or the publication  in which each state would otherwise publish proposed
rules.
F. Upon determination that an emergency exists, the commission may consider and adopt
an emergency rule  with 48 hours’ notice, with opportunity to comment, provided that the
usual rulemaking procedures shall be retroactively applied to the rule as soon  as reasonably
possible, in no event later than 90 days after the effective  date of the rule. For the purposes
of this provision, an emergency rule is one that must be adopted immediately in order to:
1. Meet an imminent threat to public health, safety, or welfare;
2. Prevent a loss of commission or member state funds;
3. Meet a deadline for the promulgation of an administrative rule  that is established by
federal law or rule; or
4. Protect public health and safety.
SECTION 10.
OVERSIGHT, DISPUTE RESOLUTION, AND ENFORCEMENT
A. Oversight
1. The executive and judicial branches of the state government in  each member state
shall enforce this Compact and take all actions necessary and  appropriate to implement this
Compact.
2. Venue is proper and judicial proceedings by or against the School Psychologist  Inter-
state Licensure Compact Commission shall be brought solely and exclusively in a  court of
competent jurisdiction where the principal office of the commission  is located. The commis-
sion may waive venue and jurisdictional defenses to the extent the  commission adopts or
consents to participate in alternative dispute resolution proceedings. Nothing herein  shall
affect or  limit the selection or propriety of venue in any action against a licensee for pro-
fessional malpractice, misconduct or any such similar matter.
3. The commission shall be entitled to receive  service of process in any proceeding re-
garding the enforcement  or interpretation of this Compact and shall have standing to inter-
vene in such a proceeding for  all purposes. Failure to provide the commission service of
process shall render  a judgment or order void as to the commission, this Compact, or
promulgated rules.
B. Default, Technical Assistance, and Termination
1. If the commission determines that a member state  has defaulted in the performance
of its obligations or responsibilities under this Compact or the promulgated rules, the com-
mission shall provide written notice to the defaulting state. The notice of  default shall de-
scribe the default,  the proposed means of curing the default, and any other action that the
commission may take, and shall offer training  and specific technical assistance regarding the
default.
2. The commission shall provide a copy of the notice of default  to the other member
states.
C. If  a state in default fails to cure the default, the defaulting state may be terminated
from this Compact upon an affirmative vote  of a supermajority of the delegates of the
member states, and all rights, privileges, and benefits conferred on that state by this Com-
pact may be terminated on the effective date of termination. A  cure of the default does not
relieve the offending state of obligations or liabilities incurred during the period of default.
D. Termination of membership in  this Compact shall be imposed only after all other
means of securing compliance have been exhausted. Notice of intent to  suspend or terminate
shall be given by the commission to the defaulting state’s governor, the majority  and mi-
nority leaders of the defaulting  state’s legislature, the defaulting state’s state licensing au-
thority and each of the member states’ state licensing authorities.
E. A state that has been terminated is responsible  for all assessments, obligations, and
liabilities incurred through the effective date of  termination, including obligations that ex-
tend beyond the effective date of termination.
Enrolled House Bill 2596 (HB 2596-INTRO) Page 10
F. Upon the termination of a state’s membership from this Compact, that state shall
immediately provide notice to all licensees within that state of  such termination. The ter-
minated state shall continue to recognize all licenses granted pursuant to this Compact  for
a minimum of six months after the date of said notice of termination.
G. The commission shall not bear any costs related to a state  that is found to be in de-
fault or that has been  terminated from this Compact, unless agreed upon in writing between
the commission and the defaulting state.
H. The defaulting state may appeal the  action of the commission by petitioning the
United States District Court for the  District of Columbia or the federal district where the
commission has its principal offices.  The prevailing party shall be awarded all costs of such
litigation, including reasonable attorney fees.
I. Dispute Resolution
1. Upon request by a member state, the  commission shall attempt to resolve disputes
related to this  Compact that arise among member states and between member and non-
member states.
2. The commission shall  promulgate a rule providing for both mediation and binding dis-
pute resolution for disputes as appropriate.
J. Enforcement
1. By majority vote as provided by rule,  the commission may initiate legal action against
a member  state in default in the United States District Court for the District of Columbia
or the  federal district where the commission has its principal offices to enforce compliance
with the provisions of this Compact and its promulgated rules. The relief  sought may include
injunctive relief. In the event judicial enforcement is necessary, the prevailing  party shall
be awarded all costs of such litigation,  including reasonable attorney fees. The remedies
herein shall not be the exclusive  remedies of the commission. The commission may pursue
any other remedies available under federal law or the defaulting member state’s law.
2. A member state may initiate legal action against the commission  in the United States
District Court for the District of Columbia or the federal district where  the commission has
its principal offices to enforce compliance with the provisions of this Compact and its
promulgated rules. The relief sought may include both injunctive  relief and damages. In the
event judicial enforcement is necessary, the  prevailing party shall be awarded all costs of
such litigation, including reasonable attorney’s fees.
3. No person other than a  member state shall enforce this Compact against the com-
mission.
SECTION 11.
EFFECTIVE DATE, WITHDRAWAL, AND AMENDMENT
A. This Compact shall come into effect on the date on  which this Compact statute is
enacted into law in the seventh member state.
1. On or after the effective date of this Compact indicated above, the  School Psychologist
Interstate Licensure Compact Commission shall convene and review the  enactment of each
of the charter member states to determine if the  statute enacted by each such charter
member state is materially different than the model compact statute.
a. A charter member state whose  enactment is found to be materially different from the
model compact statute shall be entitled to the default process set forth in section  10 of this
Compact.
b. If any member state  is later found to be in default, or is terminated or withdraws from
this Compact, the commission shall remain in existence and this Compact shall remain  in
effect even if the number of member states should be less than seven.
2. Member states enacting  this Compact subsequent to the charter member states shall
be subject to the process set forth in section 7.C.21 of this Compact to determine if  their
enactments are materially  different from the model compact statute and whether they
qualify for participation in this Compact.
Enrolled House Bill 2596 (HB 2596-INTRO) Page 11
3. All actions taken for the benefit of the commission  or in furtherance of the purposes
of the administration of this Compact  prior to the effective date of this Compact or the
commission coming into existence shall be considered to be actions  of the commission unless
specifically repudiated by the commission.
a. Any state that joins  this Compact subsequent to the commission’s initial adoption of
the rules and bylaws shall be subject to the rules and bylaws as they exist on the  date on
which this Compact becomes law in that state. Any rule  that has been previously adopted
by the commission shall have the full force and effect of  law on the day this Compact be-
comes law in that state.
b. Any member state may withdraw from this Compact by  enacting a statute repealing
the same.
B. A member state’s withdrawal shall not take  effect until 180 days after enactment of
the repealing statute.
C. Withdrawal shall not affect the continuing requirement of  the withdrawing state’s
state licensing authority to comply with the  investigative and adverse action reporting re-
quirements of this Compact prior to the effective date of withdrawal.
D. Upon the enactment of a statute withdrawing from this Compact, a state shall im-
mediately provide notice of such withdrawal to all licensees within that  state.
Notwithstanding any subsequent statutory enactment  to the contrary, such withdrawing
state shall continue to recognize all licenses granted pursuant to this Compact for a mini-
mum of six months after the date of such notice of withdrawal.
1. Nothing contained in this Compact shall be construed  to invalidate or prevent any
licensure agreement or other cooperative arrangement between a member state and a non-
member state that does not conflict with the provisions of this Compact.
2. This Compact may be amended  by the member states. No amendment to this Compact
shall become effective and binding upon any member state  until it is enacted into the laws
of all member states.
SECTION 12.
CONSTRUCTION AND SEVERABILITY
A. This Compact and the rulemaking  authority of the School Psychologist Interstate
Licensure Compact Commission shall be liberally construed so as to effectuate the purposes
and the implementation and administration of  this Compact. Provisions of this Compact ex-
pressly authorizing or requiring the promulgation of rules shall not be construed  to limit the
commission’s rulemaking authority solely for those purposes.
B. The provisions of this Compact shall be severable and if  any phrase, clause, sentence,
or provision of this Compact is held by a court of  competent jurisdiction to be contrary to
the constitution of any member state, a state  seeking participation in this Compact, or of
the United States, or the applicability thereof to any government, agency, person,  or cir-
cumstance is held to be unconstitutional  by a court of competent jurisdiction, the validity
of the remainder of this Compact and the  applicability thereof to any other government,
agency, person or circumstance shall not be affected thereby.
C. Notwithstanding  subsection B of this section, the commission may deny a state’s
participation in this Compact or,  in accordance with the requirements of section 10.B of this
Compact, terminate a member state’s participation in this Compact, if it determines that a
constitutional requirement of a member state is a material  departure from this Compact.
Otherwise, if this Compact shall be held to be contrary to the constitution of any  member
state, this Compact shall remain in full force and  effect as to the remaining member states
and in full force and effect as to the member state affected as to all severable matters.
SECTION 13.
CONSISTENT EFFECT AND CONFLICT WITH OTHER STATE LAWS
A. Nothing herein shall prevent or inhibit the enforcement of any other law of a member
state that is not inconsistent with this Compact.
B. Any laws, statutes, regulations, or other legal requirements  in a member state in
conflict with this Compact are superseded to the extent of the conflict.
Enrolled House Bill 2596 (HB 2596-INTRO) Page 12
C. All permissible  agreements between the School Psychologist Interstate Licensure
Compact Commission and the member states are binding in accordance with their terms.
D. Notwithstanding any term to the contrary in this Compact:
1. No term of this Compact may be construed  to require the State of Oregon to make
any payment to the commission or to any other person,  entity, or public body, whether
domiciled in the State of Oregon or in  any other state, territory, or foreign country, other
than pursuant to the laws of  the State of Oregon regarding the appropriation and expendi-
ture of the funds of the State of Oregon; and
2. The State of Oregon’s payment of any amounts due under this  Compact to the com-
mission or  to any other person, entity, or public body, whether domiciled in the State of
Oregon or any other state, territory, or foreign country, is conditioned on and subject to  the
State of Oregon’s receiving appropriations,  limitations, allotments or other expenditure au-
thority to allow  the State of Oregon, in the exercise of its reasonable administrative dis-
cretion, to make such payment.
Passed by House February 20, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 10, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2596 (HB 2596-INTRO) Page 13